Hawaii statutes.
[§431:4F-107] Additional requirements for
United States branch license. (a) Before issuing any new or renewal
license to any United States branch, the commissioner may require satisfactory
proof, either in the alien insurer's charter or by an agreement evidenced by a
duly certified resolution of its board of directors, or otherwise as the
commissioner may require, that the insurer will not engage in any insurance
business in contravention of this section or not authorized by its charter.

(b) The commissioner shall issue a renewal
license to any United States branch if satisfied, by such proof as required,
that the insurer is not delinquent with respect to any requirement imposed by
this chapter and that its continuance in business in this State will not be
hazardous or prejudicial to the best interests of the people of this State.

(c) No United States branch shall be licensed
to do any kind of insurance business in this State, or any combination of kinds
of insurance business, that are not permitted to be done by domestic insurers
licensed under this chapter. No United States branch shall be authorized to do
an insurance business in this State if it does anywhere within the United
States any kind of business other than an insurance business and the business
necessarily or properly incidental to the kind or kinds of insurance business
that it is authorized to do in this State.

(d) Except as otherwise specifically provided,
no United States branch, entering through this State or another state, shall be
or continue to be authorized to do an insurance business in this State if it
fails to comply substantially with any requirement or limitation of this
chapter, applicable to similar domestic insurers hereafter organized, which in
the judgment of the commissioner is reasonably necessary to protect the
interest of the policyholders.

(e) No United States branch that, outside of
this State, does any kind or combination of kinds of insurance business not
permitted to be done in this State by similar domestic insurers hereafter
organized, shall be or continue to be authorized to do an insurance business in
this State, unless in the judgment of the commissioner the doing of that kind
or combination of kinds of insurance business will not be prejudicial to the best
interests of the people of this State.

(f) No United States branch shall be or
continue to be authorized to do an insurance business in this State if it fails
to keep full and correct entries of its transactions, which shall at all times
be open to the inspection of persons invested by law with the rights of
inspection and be maintained in its principal office within this State. [L
2004, c 120, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next